Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.18.216

Clean energy technology—Report.

Beginning November 1, 2023, and at least once every two years thereafter, the board shall report to the governor and the appropriate committees of the legislature with recommendations on how the state can support worker and employer needs in response to changing workforce requirements for clean energy technology. The report must include the recommendations of the clean energy technology workforce advisory committee established in RCW 28C.18.210, the findings of the board's evaluation in RCW 28C.18.212, and the board's training recommendations in RCW 28C.18.214.

[ 2023 c 231 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 231: See note following RCW 43.41.470.